Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.047

Registration of corporate name.

Any corporation, organized and existing under the laws of any state or territory of the United States[,] may register its corporate name in accordance with RCW 23.95.315.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4105; 1994 c 211 s 1308; 1993 c 356 s 14; 1987 c 55 s 42; 1982 c 35 s 123.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1994 c 211: See note following RCW 18.04.025.

Effective date—1993 c 356: See note following RCW 24.06.046.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.